Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB415.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as described in KRS 161.795, the Education Professional Standards Board
may revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew; impose probationary or
supervisory conditions upon; issue a written reprimand or admonishment; or any
combination of those actions regarding any certificate issued under KRS 161.010 to
161.100, or any certificate or license issued under any previous law to
superintendents, principals, teachers, substitute teachers, interns, supervisors,
directors of pupil personnel, or other administrative, supervisory, or instructional
employees for the following reasons:
(a) Being convicted of, or entering an "Alford" plea or plea of nolo contendere to,
notwithstanding an order granting probation or suspending imposition of any
sentence imposed following the conviction or entry of the plea, one (1) of the
following:
1. A felony;
2. A misdemeanor under KRS Chapter 218A, 508, 509, 510, 522, 525,
529, 530, or 531; or
3. A misdemeanor involving a student or minor.
A certified copy of the conviction or plea shall be conclusive evidence of the
conviction or plea;
(b) Having sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010(7) with a student or minor.
Conviction in a criminal proceeding shall not be a requirement for
disciplinary action;
(c) Committing any act that constitutes fraudulent, corrupt, dishonest, or immoral
conduct. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding
shall not be a condition precedent to disciplinary action;
Page 1 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
(d) Demonstrating willful or careless disregard for the health, welfare, or safety
of others;
(e) Physical or mental incapacity that prevents the certificate holder from
performing duties with reasonable skill, competence, or safety;
(f) Possessing, using, or being under the influence of alcohol, which impairs the
performance of duties;
(g) Unlawfully possessing or unlawfully using a drug during the performance of
duties;
(h) Incompetency or neglect of duty;
(i) Making, or causing to be made, any false or misleading statement or
concealing a material fact in obtaining issuance or renewal of any certificate;
(j) Failing to report as required by subsection (4)[(3)] of this section;
(k) Failing to comply with an order of the Education Professional Standards
Board;
(l) Violating any state statute relating to schools or the teaching profession;
(m) Violating the professional code of ethics for Kentucky school certified
personnel established by the Education Professional Standards Board through
the promulgation of administrative regulation;
(n) Violating any administrative regulation promulgated by the Education
Professional Standards Board or the Kentucky Board of Education; or
(o) Receiving disciplinary action or having the issuance of a certificate denied or
restricted by another jurisdiction on grounds that constitute a violation of this
subsection.
(2) The Education Professional Standards Board shall respond to complaints against a
certificate holder by the following process:
(a) [1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, ]Within thirty
(30) calendar days of the receipt of a completed complaint, board staff shall
Page 2 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
conduct an initial review to determine whether there is sufficient evidence that
a violation may have occurred and shall provide notice of the initial
determination to the certificate holder within seven (7) business days that
shall include the complete copy of the report and all underlying relevant
documents and records. If the complaint alleges unauthorized electronic
communication as defined in KRS 160.145, sexual contact, or other sexual
misconduct, the identity of a complainant that is not the superintendent and
any identifying information of the minor involved shall not be subject to
public disclosure pursuant to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870
to 61.884[in the complaint shall remain confidential.
2. When a complaint alleges unauthorized electronic communication, as
defined in KRS 160.145, sexual contact, or other sexual misconduct, the
board staff shall have one hundred twenty (120) days to conduct the
initial review required by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph];
(b) Upon receipt of the notice, the certificate holder shall have thirty (30)
calendar days to respond or provide a rebuttal to any complaint that was
determined to contain sufficient evidence that a violation may have occurred.
The response period shall be extended an additional thirty (30) calendar days
upon the certificate holder's written request submitted to the board;
(c) Within ten (10) business days of the receipt of the certificate holder's response
or the end of the response period established in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, board staff shall conduct another review of the complaint to
determine if sufficient evidence exists to support a violation. If the board staff
determines that the evidence is:
1. Insufficient, then the board staff shall recommend dismissal and shall
notify the certificate holder and the complainant of the recommendation
within seven (7) business days of the determination; or
Page 3 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
2. Sufficient, then the board staff shall have seven (7) business days to
notify the certificate holder and the complainant of the determination.
Notice to the complainant shall only state that further proceedings will
occur;
(d) [Upon a determination that sufficient evidence exists to support a possible
violation, within the notice required under paragraph (c)2. of this subsection,
board staff shall initiate an in-person or virtual conference with the certificate
holder to share information and to determine if an agreed resolution can be
recommended to the board concerning the alleged violation. The conference
shall be scheduled within thirty (30) calendar days of the determination. The
certificate holder may decline the conference. If the conference does not occur
due to the certificate holder's failure to respond within the thirty (30) calendar
days, the required conference shall be considered waived. The certificate
holder may have an attorney present at the conference;
(e) ]Within[Upon the conclusion of the] thirty (30) calendar days of the board
staff determination[conference period], the board shall act on the complaint[
within thirty (30) calendar days]. If the board fails to act on the complaint
within the thirty (30) calendar days, then the complaint shall be considered
dismissed. The board shall consider the entirety of the complaint with any
associated response or recommended agreed resolution to determine:
1. Dismissal or[,] conditional dismissal upon completion of training;[,]
2. Issuance of a written admonishment to the certificate holder if the
board determines, based on the evidence, that a violation has occurred
that is not of a serious nature. Once the determination has been made,
notice shall be provided to the certificate holder of the action with a
copy of the written admonishment. The certificate holder may respond
to the notice in writing within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt and
Page 4 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
have the response placed in his or her official certification file.
Alternatively, the certificate holder may file a request for a hearing
with the board within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the notice.
Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, the board shall set aside the
written admonishment and refer the matter for a hearing under
subsection (3) of this section within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt
of the request. If after thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice the
certificate holder has not requested a hearing, the written
admonishment shall be placed in the official certification file of the
certificate holder along with any timely written
response;[admonishment]
3. Referral of the complaint to a hearing because the complaint may
warrant possible revocation, suspension, refusal to renew, imposition
of probationary or supervisory conditions, issuance of a formal written
reprimand, or any combination of these actions regarding any
certificate, or further investigation[, or initiation of a hearing];
4.[2.] Approval of the recommended agreed resolution; or
5.[3.] A deferral if:
a. The content of the complaint is subject to ongoing:
i. Criminal investigation or proceedings;
ii. Child abuse, dependency, or neglect investigation by an
authorized state agency; or
iii. Teacher tribunal process as provided in KRS 161.790; or
b. The deferral is agreed to by the certificate holder; and
(e)[(f)] The board staff shall provide[provision of] a confirmation of receipt[
from the board] to the certificate holder whenever the certificate holder
submits a response or correspondence to the board.
Page 5 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
(3) The Education Professional Standards Board shall schedule and conduct
hearings in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B subject to the following:
(a) A hearing shall occur:
1. Upon referral under subsection (2)(d) of this section; or
2. After the denial of an application for a certificate, upon written
request of appeal by the applicant filed within thirty (30) calendar days
of receipt of the letter advising of the denial;
(b) If a certificate holder or applicant believes the hearing is not timely
following a referral for a hearing under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the certificate holder or applicant may submit a request for an expedited
hearing. The expedited hearing shall be conducted within sixty (60)
calendar days of the request. If the hearing fails to be convened within sixty
(60) days of the request and the subject of the hearing is:
1. A referral under subsection (2)(d) of this section, the referral shall be
dismissed with prejudice; and
2. An appeal of denial under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection, the
denial shall be reversed;
(c) Upon request, a hearing may be public or private at the discretion of the
certificate holder or applicant;
(d) Until and including June 30, 2027, the hearing shall be conducted before a
hearing officer secured pursuant to KRS 13B.030. The hearing shall afford
the certificate holder or applicant all the rights secured under KRS Chapter
13B; and
(e) Beginning July 1, 2027, the hearing shall be conducted before a hearing
officer who is a licensed attorney secured by the board from the Office of
the Attorney General under KRS Chapter 13B. The hearing shall afford the
certificate holder or applicant all the rights secured under KRS Chapter
Page 6 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
13B.
(4)[(3) (a)] The superintendent of each local school district shall report in writing to
the Education Professional Standards Board the name, address, phone number,
Social Security number, and position name of any certificate holder employed in
the[certified school employee in the employee's] district whose contract is
terminated or not renewed, for cause except failure to meet local standards for
quality of teaching performance prior to the employee gaining tenure; who resigns
from, or otherwise leaves, a position under threat of contract termination, or
nonrenewal, for cause; who is convicted in a criminal prosecution; or who
otherwise may have engaged in any actions or conduct while employed in the
school district that might reasonably be expected to warrant consideration for action
against the certificate under subsection (1) of this section, including knowledge of
a report being filed against a certificate holder pursuant to KRS 620.030.
(a) The duty to report shall exist without regard to any disciplinary action, or lack
thereof, by the superintendent, and the required report shall be submitted
within thirty (30) calendar days of notification of the event giving rise to the
duty to report.
(b) The district superintendent shall inform the Education Professional Standards
Board in writing of the full facts and circumstances leading to the contract
termination or nonrenewal, resignation, or other absence, conviction, or
otherwise reported actions or conduct of the certified employee, that may
warrant action against the certificate under subsection (1) of this section, and
shall forward copies of all relevant documents and records in his or her
possession.
(c) The Education Professional Standards Board shall provide the superintendent
confirmation of receipt of any report submitted by the superintendent within
seven (7) business days and shall provide the superintendent with notice of:
Page 7 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
1. Whether or not board staff determine that there is sufficient evidence in
the report that a violation may have occurred; and
2. Any board action taken against the certificate holder who is the subject
of the report.
(d) If the Education Professional Standards Board staff determines that a
complaint filed by a party other than the employing superintendent against
a certificate holder employed in the superintendent's district contains
sufficient credible evidence to warrant further investigation, and after the
certificate holder has been notified of the complaint, the superintendent
shall be provided with confidential notice of:
1. The existence and the substance of the complaint and the staff
determination of sufficient credible evidence; and
2. Any final, public board action taken against the certificate holder who
is the subject of the complaint.
Notice provided to the superintendent under subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph shall be confidential, shall not constitute a finding of
misconduct, and shall not require or imply the need for employment action
by the superintendent. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to alter
or expand the investigative authority, confidentiality requirements, or
disciplinary procedures of the Education Professional Standards Board.
(e) The Education Professional Standards Board may consider reports and
information received from other sources.
(f)[(e)] The certificate holder[certified school employee] shall be given a copy
of any report provided to the Education Professional Standards Board by the
district superintendent or other sources. The employee shall have the right to
file a written rebuttal pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to the report
which shall be placed in the official file with the report.
Page 8 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
(5)[(4)] A finding or action by a school superintendent or tribunal does not create a
presumption of a violation or lack of a violation of subsection (1) of this section.
[(5) The board may issue a written admonishment to the certificate holder if the board
determines, based on the evidence, that a violation has occurred that is not of a
serious nature. A copy of the written admonishment shall be placed in the official
file of the certificate holder. The certificate holder may respond in writing to the
admonishment within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt and have that response
placed in his or her official certification file. Alternatively, the certificate holder
may file a request for a hearing with the board within thirty (30) calendar days of
receipt of the admonishment. Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, the board
shall set aside the written admonishment and set the matter for hearing pursuant to
the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the
request.
(6) (a) In accordance with the timeline specified in this section, the Education
Professional Standards Board shall schedule and conduct a hearing in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B:
1. Upon determining that a complaint warrants possible revoking,
suspending, refusing to renew, imposing probationary or supervisory
conditions upon, issuing a written reprimand, or any combination of
these actions regarding any certificate;
2. After denying an application for a certificate, upon written request filed
within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the letter advising of the
denial; or
3. After issuing a written admonishment, upon written request for a
hearing filed within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the written
admonishment.
(b) If after the hearing required under paragraph (a) of this subsection is
Page 9 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
scheduled and the certificate holder or applicant believes the hearing is not
timely, the certificate holder or applicant may submit a request for an
expedited hearing, and the hearing shall be conducted within sixty (60)
calendar days of the request.
(c) Upon request, a hearing may be public or private at the discretion of the
certified employee or applicant.
(d) The hearing shall be conducted before a hearing officer secured by the board
pursuant to KRS 13B.030 and the board may:
1. Employ hearing officers;
2. Contract with another agency for hearing officers;
3. Contract with private attorneys through personal service contracts; or
4. Secure a hearing officer from the Attorney General's office.
(e) The hearing shall afford the certificate holder all the rights secured under KRS
Chapter 13B.]
(6)[(7)] The Education Professional Standards Board or its chair may take emergency
action pursuant to KRS 13B.125. Emergency action shall not affect a certificate
holder's contract or tenure rights in the school district.
(7)[(8)] If the Education Professional Standards Board substantiates that sexual
contact occurred between a certified employee and a student or minor, the
employee's certificate may be revoked or suspended with mandatory treatment of
the employee as prescribed by the Education Professional Standards Board. The
Education Professional Standards Board may require the employee to pay a
specified amount for mental health services for the student or minor which are
needed as a result of the sexual contact.
(8)[(9)] At any time during the investigative or hearing processes, the board may enter
into an agreed order or accept an assurance of voluntary compliance with the
certificate holder.
Page 10 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
(9)[(10)] The board may reconsider, modify, or reverse its decision on any disciplinary
action.
(10)[(11)] Suspension of a certificate shall be for a specified period of time, not to
exceed two (2) years.
(a) At the conclusion of the specified period, upon demonstration of compliance
with any educational requirements and the terms set forth in the agreed order,
the certificate shall be reactivated.
(b) A suspended certificate is subject to expiration and termination.
(11)[(12)] Revocation of a certificate is a permanent forfeiture. The board shall establish
the minimum period of time before an applicant can apply for a new certificate.
(a) At the conclusion of the specified period, and upon demonstration of
compliance with any educational requirements and the terms set forth in the
agreed order, the applicant shall bear the burden of proof to show that he or
she is again fit for practice.
(b) The board shall have discretion to impose conditions that it deems reasonably
appropriate to ensure the applicant's fitness and the protection of public
safety. Any conditions imposed by the board shall address or apply to only
that time period after the revocation of the certificate.
(12)[(13)] An appeal from any final order of the Education Professional Standards Board
shall be filed in Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court of the county in which
the certificate holder was employed when the incident occurred in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B which provides that all final orders of an agency shall be subject
to judicial review.
Section 2. KRS 156.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall establish, direct, and maintain a
statewide program of professional development to improve instruction in the
public schools.
Page 11 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
(b) By August 1, 2025, the department shall create a four (4) year recurring
professional development training schedule that includes all professional
development for certified personnel required by subsection (2) of this section
and federal law.
(c) Each local school district shall implement the professional development
training schedule created by the department.
(2) All certified school district employees and public charter school employees shall
complete at least one (1) hour of each of the following trainings within twelve (12)
months of initial hire and at least once every four (4) years thereafter:
(a) How to respond to an active shooter situation training prepared by the
Department of Criminal Justice Training in collaboration with the department,
the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, and the Center for School Safety;
(b) Child abuse and neglect prevention, recognition, and reporting training from
the list of trainings approved by the department in accordance with subsection
(7) of this section;
(c) 1. High-quality, evidence-based suicide prevention training, including risk
factors, warning signs, protective factors, response procedures, referral,
postvention, and the recognition of signs and symptoms of possible
mental illness.
2. As used in this paragraph, "postvention" means a series of planned
supports and interventions with persons affected by a suicide for the
purpose of facilitating the grieving or adjustment process, stabilizing the
environment, reducing the risk of negative behaviors, and limiting the
risk of further suicides through contagion; and
(d) Self-study review of seizure disorder materials.
(3) (a) Each local school district superintendent shall appoint a certified school
employee to fulfill the role and responsibilities of a professional development
Page 12 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
coordinator who shall disseminate professional development information to
schools and personnel. Upon request by a school council or any employees of
the district, the coordinator shall provide technical assistance to the council or
the personnel that may include assisting with needs assessments, analyzing
school data, planning and evaluation assistance, organizing districtwide
programs requested by school councils or groups of teachers, or other
coordination activities.
(b) The manner of appointment, qualifications, and other duties of the
professional development coordinator shall be established by the local board
of education.
(c) The local district professional development coordinator may participate in the
Kentucky Department of Education annual training program for local school
district professional development coordinators. The training program may
include but not be limited to the demonstration of various approaches to needs
assessment and planning; strategies for implementing long-term, school-based
professional development; strategies for strengthening teachers' roles in the
planning, development, and evaluation of professional development; and
demonstrations of model professional development programs. The training
shall include information about teacher learning opportunities relating to the
core content standards. The department shall regularly collect and distribute
this information.
(4) The department shall provide or facilitate optional, professional development
programs for certified personnel throughout the Commonwealth that are based on
the statewide needs of teachers, administrators, and other education personnel.
Programs may include classified staff and parents when appropriate. Programs
offered or facilitated by the department shall be at locations and times convenient to
local school personnel and shall be made accessible through the use of technology
Page 13 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
when appropriate. They shall include programs that: address the goals for Kentucky
schools as stated in KRS 158.6451, including reducing the achievement gaps as
determined by an equity analysis of the disaggregated student performance data
from the state assessment program developed under KRS 158.6453; engage
educators in effective learning processes and foster collegiality and collaboration;
and provide support for staff to incorporate newly acquired skills into their work
through practicing the skills, gathering information about the results, and reflecting
on their efforts. Professional development programs shall be made available to
teachers based on their needs which shall include but not be limited to the following
areas:
(a) Strategies to reduce the achievement gaps among various groups of students
and to provide continuous progress;
(b) Curriculum content and methods of instruction for each content area,
including differentiated instruction;
(c) School-based decision making;
(d) Assessment literacy;
(e) Integration of performance-based student assessment into daily classroom
instruction;
(f) Nongraded primary programs;
(g) Research-based instructional practices;
(h) Instructional uses of technology;
(i) Curriculum design to serve the needs of students with diverse learning styles
and skills and of students of diverse cultures;
(j) Instruction in reading, including phonics, phonemic awareness,
comprehension, fluency, and vocabulary;
(k) Educational leadership; and
(l) Strategies to incorporate character education throughout the curriculum.
Page 14 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
(5) The department shall assist school personnel in assessing the impact of professional
development on their instructional practices and student learning.
(6) (a) Upon the request of a school district or school council, the department shall
assist with the development of long-term school and district improvement
plans that include multiple strategies for professional development based on
the assessment of needs at the school level.
(b) Professional development strategies may include but are not limited to
participation in subject matter academies, teacher networks, training institutes,
workshops, seminars, and study groups; collegial planning; action research;
mentoring programs; appropriate university courses; and other forms of
professional development.
(c) In planning the use of the four (4) days for professional development under
KRS 158.070, school councils and districts shall give priority to programs that
increase teachers' understanding of curriculum content and methods of
instruction appropriate for each content area based on individual school plans.
The district may use up to one (1) day to provide district-wide training and
training that is mandated by state or federal law. Only those employees
identified in the mandate or affected by the mandate shall be required to
attend the training.
(d) State funds allocated for professional development shall be used to support
professional development initiatives that are consistent with local school
improvement and professional development plans and teachers' individual
growth plans. The funds may be used throughout the year for all staff,
including classified and certified staff and parents on school councils or
committees. A portion of the funds allocated to each school council under
KRS 160.345 may be used to prepare or enhance the teachers' knowledge and
teaching practices related to the content and subject matter that are required
Page 15 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
for their specific classroom assignments.
(7) (a) The department shall develop and maintain a list of approved comprehensive
evidence-informed trainings on child abuse and neglect prevention,
recognition, and reporting that encompass child physical, sexual, and
emotional abuse and neglect.
(b) The trainings shall be web-based or in-person and cover, at a minimum, the
following topics:
1. Recognizing child physical, sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect;
2. Reporting suspected child abuse and neglect in Kentucky as required by
KRS 620.030 and the appropriate documentation;
3. Responding to the child; and
4. Understanding the response of child protective services.
(c) The trainings shall include a questionnaire or other basic assessment tool upon
completion to document basic knowledge of training components.
(d) Each local board of education shall adopt one (1) or more trainings from the
list approved by the department to be implemented by schools.
(8) (a) By May 1, 2027, the Kentucky Department of Education, in collaboration
with the Education Professional Standards Board, shall develop a training
for school district employees, to be available via multiple delivery options,
related to appropriate relationships and communication with students,
inappropriate relationships and communication with students, sexual
grooming, and sexual misconduct. Each local school district shall require
all current employees to complete the training by June 30, 2027.
(b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, every local school district shall
require all new employees to undergo the training described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection within ninety (90) days of the employee's initial hiring.
Any new employee who has completed the training within the prior five (5)
Page 16 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
years with a previous employer shall be exempt from the requirement under
this paragraph.
(c) The requirements of this subsection shall apply to public charter schools as
a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(9) The department shall establish an electronic consumer bulletin board that posts
information regarding professional development providers and programs as a
service to school district central office personnel, school councils, teachers, and
administrators. Participation on the electronic consumer bulletin board shall be
voluntary for professional development providers or vendors, but shall include all
programs sponsored by the department. Participants shall provide the following
information: program title; name of provider or vendor; qualifications of the
presenters or instructors; objectives of the program; program length; services
provided, including follow-up support; costs for participation and costs of
materials; names of previous users of the program, addresses, and telephone
numbers; and arrangements required. Posting information on the bulletin board by
the department shall not be viewed as an endorsement of the quality of any specific
provider or program.
(10)[(9)] The department shall provide voluntary training to address the characteristics
and instructional needs of students at risk of school failure and most likely to drop
out of school. The training shall be developed to meet the specific needs of all
certified and classified personnel depending on their relationship with these
students. The training for instructional personnel shall be designed to provide and
enhance skills of personnel to:
(a) Identify at-risk students early in elementary schools as well as at-risk and
potential dropouts in the middle and high schools;
(b) Plan specific instructional strategies to teach at-risk students;
(c) Improve the academic achievement of students at risk of school failure by
Page 17 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
providing individualized and extra instructional support to increase
expectations for targeted students;
(d) Involve parents as partners in ways to help their children and to improve their
children's academic progress; and
(e) Significantly reduce the dropout rate of all students.
(11)[(10)] The department shall establish teacher academies to the extent funding is
available in cooperation with postsecondary education institutions for elementary,
middle school, and high school faculty in core disciplines, utilizing facilities and
faculty from universities and colleges, local school districts, and other appropriate
agencies throughout the state. Priority for participation shall be given to those
teachers who are teaching core discipline courses for which they do not have a
major or minor or the equivalent. Participation of teachers shall be voluntary.
(12)[(11)] The department shall annually provide to the oversight council established in
KRS 15A.063, the information received from local schools pursuant to KRS
158.449.
Section 3. KRS 156.492 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education may enter into an agreement with any
building and construction trade organization to develop a training program for
school counselors providing services to students in the Commonwealth. The
purpose of the training program shall be to promote building and construction
trades and training facilities available to students by making school counselors
aware of what is available to students participating in the building and construction
trade. The training program shall include information relating to:
(a) The pay and benefits available to people who work in the building and
construction trades; and
(b) Job opportunities, pre-apprenticeships, apprenticeships, and pathways within
the building and construction trade industry.
Page 18 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
(2) The participating trade organization shall ensure ample opportunities for school
counselors that serve grades seven (7) through twelve (12) to complete the training
created under subsection (1) of this section annually and shall bear all costs
associated with the training. The participating trade organization may choose to
offer professional development opportunities to teachers who serve students in
grades seven (7) through twelve (12), if resources are available for this purpose.
(3) The department shall include the training program created in this section on the
electronic consumer bulletin board created pursuant to KRS 156.095[(8)] if
requested by the training program.
(4) A school counselor serving students in grades seven (7) through twelve (12) may
complete four (4) hours of training developed under this section which shall count
towards the twenty-one (21) hours required annually pursuant to KRS
156.101(4)(b)2.
(5) Local boards of education or school-based decision making councils may
incorporate this training as part of the four (4) days of professional development
required pursuant to KRS 158.070(3)(a) for teachers who serve students in grades
seven (7) through twelve (12) if offered by the participating trade organization.
Section 4. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
Page 19 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet the
needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom setting
but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms, centers, or
campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance, improve
behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative education
programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(c) "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child abuse or
neglect relating to a specific individual;
(d) "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son and
daughter; and
(e) "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the resignation,
dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified staff
member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local school
district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-employee
bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position openings
created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or
death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for which
certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified positions
remain open after compliance with those procedures.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
Page 20 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing;
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer outside of the process established in KRS 156.161. If the waiver is
approved, the appointment shall not be made until the person recommended
for the position has been approved by the chief state school officer. The chief
state school officer shall respond to a district's request for waiver or for
approval of an appointment within two (2) working days; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district.
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
Page 21 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(d) A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified or classified
employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
Page 22 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580; or
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
3. A student teacher;
4. A school-based decision making council parent member; and
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
prior to June 27, 2019;
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
Page 23 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and CA/N letter required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection but shall be removed from the council on receipt by the school
district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, or
as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further procedures
shall be required;
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual;[ and]
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
accordance with KRS 156.153(3) shall require the driver of any non-school
bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from school
pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a valid
commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter 281A
with an "S" endorsement to:
Page 24 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification;
and
(f) Pursuant to the Open Records Act, as set forth in KRS 61.870 to 61.884, a
superintendent may submit to each school district that employs or
previously employed a certified applicant and the Education Professional
Standards Board a request for any records concerning disciplinary actions
or professional misconduct concerning the applicant prior to extending an
offer of employment.
(7) (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
Page 25 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime nor as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and receipt
of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no administrative
findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child
abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and no
further procedures shall be required.
(8) The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a certified
employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex crime or as a
violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N check
showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(9) (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
Page 26 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
including the dates of residency; and
2. Provide picture identification.
(10) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary,
any certified or classified employee of the school district shall notify the
superintendent within ten (10) business days of being[when an employee of the
school district is] charged with any offense which is classified as a felony.[,] The
superintendent may transfer the employee to a second position until such time as
the employee is found not guilty, the charges are dismissed, the employee is
terminated, or the superintendent determines that further personnel action is not
required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same rate of pay he or she
received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with an offense outside of
the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the charge would have
been treated as a felony if committed within the Commonwealth. Transfers shall be
Page 27 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 415/GA
made to prevent disruption of the educational process and district operations and in
the interest of students and staff and shall not be construed as evidence of
misconduct.
(11) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified employee of
the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has been found by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a child, and if
he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child abuse or
neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal. Any failure to
report this finding shall result in the certified or classified employee being subject
to dismissal or termination.
(12) The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services website.
Page 28 of 28
HB041510.100 - 1308 - XXXX 2/25/2026 3:33 PM GA